Vermont, session 2025-2026, H449.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. chapter 45 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 45. POLITICAL PARTIES
* * *
§ 2302. STATE CHAIR TO CALL CAUCUS
(a) The chair of the State committee of a party shall set a date for members
of the party to meet in caucus in their respective towns. The date shall be
between September 10 and September 30, inclusive, in the month of
September in each odd-numbered year.
VT LEG #380648 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.449
2025 Page 2 of 2
* * *
§ 2306. PROCEDURE UPON FAILURE TO HOLD CAUCUS
If the voters of the party residing in any town fail to hold a caucus on the
day designated by the State chair, the county chair or any three or more voters
of the party residing in the town may call and hold a caucus at any time
thereafter, in the manner provided in pursuant to the procedures in sections
2303 through 2305 of this chapter. Those The county chair or the voters
calling the caucus shall designate one person among them to perform the duties
prescribed in of the town chair pursuant to section 2303 for the town chair of
this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380648 v.1